Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-270
Voting for directors; cumulative voting.

(MBCA 7.28) (a) Unless otherwise
provided in the articles of incorporation, directors are elected by a plurality
of the votes cast by the shares entitled to vote in the election at a meeting
at which a quorum is present.

(b) In all elections for
directors, every shareholder entitled to vote at such elections shall have
the right to vote in person or by proxy for the number of shares owned by
him or her, for as many persons as there are directors to be elected or to
cumulate such shares and give one candidate as many votes as the number of
directors multiplied by the number of his or her shares shall equal, or to
distribute them upon the same principle among as many candidates as he or
she thinks fit, and such directors shall not be elected in any other manner.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 70.